src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v2_anttaat_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - anttaat - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     anttaat+V+Inf: anttaat
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: annan
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: annat
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: anttaa
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: annama
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: annatta
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: annethaan
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: annoin
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: annoit
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: antoi
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: annoima
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: annoitta
     anttaat+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: annethiin
     anttaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: antanu
     anttaat+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: annettu
     anttaat+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: antanheet
     anttaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: anttaava
     anttaat+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: anttaavat
     anttaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: annettava
     anttaat+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: annettavat

     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: antaisin
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: antaisit
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: antais
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: antaisimma
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: antaisitta
     anttaat+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: annettais
     anttaat+V+Pass+Cond: annettais

     anttaat+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: anna
     anttaat+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: antakkaa
     
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: antamassa
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: antamasta
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: antamhaan
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: antamalla
     anttaat+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: antamatta
